California, session 20252026, AB2725.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 626.2 of the Penal Code is amended to read:626.2. (a) Every student or employee who, after a hearing or institutional process, has been suspended or dismissed from a community college, a state university, the university, an independent institution of higher education, or a public or private school for disrupting the orderly operation of the campus or facility of the institution, and as a condition of the suspension or dismissal has been denied access to the campus or facility, or both, of the institution for the period of the suspension or in the case of dismissal for a period not to exceed one year; who has been served by registered or certified mail, at the last address given by that person, with a written notice of the suspension or dismissal and condition; and who willfully and knowingly enters upon the campus or facility of the institution to which that person has been denied access, without the express written permission of the chief administrative officer of the campus or facility, is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500), by imprisonment in a county jail for a period of not more than six months, or by both that fine and imprisonment.Knowledge(b) Knowledge shall be presumed if notice has been given as prescribed in this section. The presumption established by this section is a presumption affecting the burden of proof.